Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB799.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part V heading of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:PART VEMPLOYMENT [PREFERENCES] AND PENSIONSSection 2. Title 51 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 74VETERANS' BENEFITS AND SERVICES WORKPLACE POSTING Sec.7401. Definitions.7402. Workplace posting.§ 7401. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 1234567891011121314151617 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employer." An employer with a worksite in this Commonwealth at which more than 50 full-time employees are employed. "Full-time employee." An individual that is employed by an employer and works at least 40 hours per week."Workplace posting." The posting created by the department under section 7402(a) (relating to workplace posting).§ 7402. Workplace posting . (a) Creation.--The department shall create a standardized workplace posting for placement by an employer. The Department of Labor and Industry shall place the workplace posting on the department's publicly accessible Internet website so that an employer can print a copy of the workplace posting.(b) Placement.--The workplace posting shall be displayed by an employer in a conspicuous area accessible to employees. AN EMPLOYER MAY COMPLY WITH THIS SUBSECTION BY PLACING THE WORKPLACE POSTING ON AN EMPLOYER'S INTERNET WEBSITE THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO EMPLOYEES.(c) Contents.--The workplace posting shall include the following:(1) Contact and website information for the department.(2) Information and contacts for a range of Federal and State benefits and services for veterans and veterans' families.(3) Contact information for the United States Department of Veterans Affairs Crisis Line.(4) Contact information for county directors of veterans affairs.(d) Policy.--The following shall apply to the workplace 20250HB0799PN2027 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 posting:(1) The department shall transmit notice of the content of the workplace posting to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The workplace posting shall not be subject to review under the following:(i) Section 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(ii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iii) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF 51 PA.C.S. § 7402(B) SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 180 DAYS.(2) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 90 DAYS.20250HB0799PN2027 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122